Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Inspections

15.605.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

15.610

to

15.635

unless the context requires otherwise:

“Inspection” means any regular, on-site investigation periodically conducted, or any request for information periodically solicited in lieu of an on-site investigation, by or on behalf of any public agency for the purpose of determining whether to award, renew, alter, suspend or revoke a license, permit, accreditation or rating of a public or private organization, or of any property employed by a public or private organization in conducting its business, in the Commonwealth. The term shall not include inspections conducted by or on behalf of an urban-county department of health or special investigations conducted by law enforcement officers or grand juries, or, upon specific complaint, by public agencies with competent jurisdiction of the subject matter of the complaint, or by members of legislative bodies.

“Duplicative inspection” or “an inspection that duplicates” means one of two or more inspections that are conducted at different times during the same calendar year and that inquire into the same condition of the premises of, or business conducted by, the same public or private organization.

“Inspecting agency” means any agency of the state government or of a political subdivision of the state, other than an urban-county department of health, that conducts inspections within the Commonwealth.

“Conflicting standard” or “a standard that conflicts” means one of two or more standards relating to the quality of a public or private organization, or of the business conducted by such organization, or of property used by such organization in conducting its business, that are employed in the same inspection or in duplicative inspections and which cannot be met simultaneously.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 46, § 1; 1978, ch. 242, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Department of Labor (now Labor Cabinet) inspections of businesses concerning safety hazards and the Department’s inspections to detect violations of the Minimum Wage Law and the Child Labor Laws are not covered by this section’s definition of “inspections.”

OAG 76-344

.

The Kentucky Drug Formulary Council is not authorized by law to conduct inspections of pharmacies and while the Division of Consumer Health Protection Services is authorized to inspect pharmacies it may not do so on a regular basis but only when probable cause exists; the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy is the only agency authorized to conduct an inspection of the sort contemplated by subsection (1) of this section.

OAG 78-807

.

15.610.
Primary jurisdiction.

No inspecting agency shall conduct an inspection or employ a standard relating to a condition over which another inspecting agency or the federal government has primary jurisdiction, except under an agreement with the entity having primary jurisdiction, or an order of the Attorney General, adopted under KRS

15.605

to

15.635

.

If a question of primary jurisdiction over a condition involves two or more governmental agencies, the agencies shall attempt to determine which of the agencies has primary jurisdiction over the condition under existing law. If the inspecting agencies cannot determine which agency has primary jurisdiction, they shall immediately refer the question to the Attorney General, who shall determine, based upon existing law, which of the agencies has primary jurisdiction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 46, § 2, effective July 1, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where Kentucky Department of Labor (now Labor Cabinet) receives complaints from employees who are faced with choice of driving defective and unsafe vehicles on public highways or being fired, the Department of Labor (now Labor Cabinet) is not restricted in exercising jurisdiction to just “off the road” job site employees, since KRS

338.021

applies labor’s safety jurisdiction to all employers and employees in all places and an occupational safety and health hazard is, under KRS

338.015

, any detrimental practice or condition in a place of employment; however, the Department of Labor (now Labor Cabinet) is not required to enforce standards under these sections, and may refrain from exercising that jurisdiction by agreement under this section with other enforcement agencies which exercise dual and overlapping jurisdictions, and the Department of Labor (now Labor Cabinet) will lose any jurisdiction which it does retain at such time as the bureau of vehicle regulation and the vehicle equipment safety commission promulgate rules, regulations, or a code which supersede the statutes governing the Department of Labor (now Labor Cabinet) jurisdiction.

OAG 81-24

.

15.615.
Method of consolidating inspections. [Repealed.]

15.620.
Eliminating conflicts among standards.

Effective January 1, 1977, no inspecting agency shall employ in its inspections any standard that conflicts with any other standard it employs in the same inspection or with standards employed by another inspecting agency or by the federal government.

Inspecting agencies with conflicting standards may enter into agreements among themselves and with the federal government to eliminate conflicts among their standards. All such agreements shall be in writing and shall be filed with the Attorney General.

If inspecting agencies with conflicting standards cannot agree among themselves or with the federal government on the method for eliminating conflicts among standards, they shall immediately refer the issue to the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall determine the method for resolving the conflict subject to the following requirements:

No inspecting agency shall employ a standard that conflicts with a standard employed by the federal government;

No local governmental inspecting agency shall employ a standard that conflicts with a standard employed by an inspecting agency of the state government;

No city inspecting agency shall employ a standard that conflicts with a standard employed by an inspecting agency of the county in which it is located; and

If two (2) or more inspecting agencies of the same level or unit of government have conflicting standards, only the standard of the inspecting agency with primary jurisdiction over the condition governed by the standard, as determined under KRS

15.610

, shall be employed, unless the inspecting agency with primary jurisdiction is prohibited from employing the standard by paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

In determining the method for eliminating conflicts among standards under subsection (3) of this section, the Attorney General shall select the method that he determines will best protect the public health, safety and welfare.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 46, § 4.

15.625.
Appeal.

Any person aggrieved by a determination of the Attorney General under KRS

15.610

to

15.620

may appeal the determination to the Franklin Circuit Court or to the Circuit Court of the county in which the appellant resides. The court, sitting without a jury, shall dispose of the appeal in a summary manner, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, being limited to determining whether:

The Attorney General acted without or in excess of his powers;

The determination is in conformity with KRS

15.605

to

15.635

; and

The findings of fact support the determination.

The Circuit Court, in its discretion, may make further findings of fact and allow the introduction of proof by the interested parties.

The court shall enter its findings on the order book as a judgment of the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 46, § 5.

15.630.
Injunctive relief against inspecting agency.

If any inspecting agency conducts or threatens to conduct an inspection, or employs or threatens to employ a standard, in violation of KRS

15.605

to

15.635

, the Attorney General, on his own initiative or upon a sworn complaint with good cause shown by any person aggrieved by the alleged violation, shall apply to the Franklin Circuit Court or to the Circuit Court of the county in which the alleged violation occurred or is likely to occur for injunctive relief against the inspecting agency.

Any person aggrieved by an inspection conducted or about to be conducted, or by the employment of or threat to employ a standard, in violation of KRS

15.605

to

15.635

, may file a sworn complaint with the Attorney General or may apply to the Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court of the county in which the alleged violation occurred or is likely to occur for injunctive relief against the inspecting agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 46, § 6.

15.635.
Effect on conflicting laws.

All sections of the Kentucky Revised Statutes in conflict with KRS

15.605

to

15.630

are repealed to the extent that they are inconsistent with KRS

15.605

to

15.630

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 46, § 7, effective July 1, 1978.